California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 percent of the total purses raced for in the California sires stakes races shall be awarded to the standardbred breeders of the horses that earned purse money in the California standardbred sires stakes races in proportion to the amount of purse money earned by each horse.

(h) An amount equal to 2 percent of the total purses raced for in the California sires stakes races shall be awarded to the owners of the registered California standardbred stallions that sired horses that earned purse money in the California standardbred sires stakes races in proportion to the amount of purse money earned by each horse so sired.

(i) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the board may establish a series of races for two-year-old and three-year-old fillies that are wholly owned by a California resident on the first day of January of the year that they become two years old and are wholly owned by a
 California resident on the day of the race.

(j) The balance of the remaining funds, including nominating, sustaining, and entry fees, and after the expenditures described in subdivisions (e), (g), (h), and (i) have been made, shall be allocated to purses for races comprising the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program.

(k) The schedule of races that shall comprise the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program during each year shall be set by the board in accordance with the following criteria:

(1) California standardbred sires stakes races shall be scheduled for two-year-old or three-year-old trotters and two-year-old and three-year-old pacers at the discretion of the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Committee, except that no two-year-old races shall be held before the first day of June of any year. Races
 for four-year-old or aged trotters and four-year-old or aged pacers may also be scheduled.

(2) Base purses for each set of races conducted during any given year at any race meeting shall be determined by the committee.

(3) In each division of each race in the California standardbred sires stakes races, the purse shall be divided in the following manner:1st 50%2nd 25%3rd 12%4th 8%5th 5%

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 9.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19619.1.

With respect to harness meetings, all funds that are not distributed to horsemen as purses pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19612, Section 19612.6, and subdivision (d) of Section 19616.1 or as breeder awards pursuant to Sections 19567 and 19617.5 within 180 days after the conclusion of a licensed harness race meet or a portion of a split harness meet, shall be deposited into the account for the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program established pursuant to Section 19619.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 748, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19619.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, funds may be made available to supplement the purses distributed by the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program from purse funds generated pursuant to Sections 19612, 19612.2, 19612.3, and 19612.6 upon agreement by the recognized harness horsemen’s organization and the harness racing association conducting the live racing meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19619.6.

Every association or fair that provides a live audiovisual signal of its program to a satellite wagering facility pursuant to Sections 19608 and 19608.1 shall cooperate with the operator of the satellite wagering facility with respect to arrangements with the ontrack totalizator company for access to its ontrack totalizator system for purposes of combining parimutuel pools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 57, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19619.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no later than July 1, 2008, the board shall provide that the jockey who rides the horse that finishes in fourth place in a thoroughbred horse race shall be entitled to a reasonable riding fee, not to exceed 2 percent of the owner’s share of the purse, provided that the riding fee is no greater than that earned by the jockeys whose horses finish second and third in the same race.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 605, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Revenue [19620.3. - 19642.1.]

19620.3.

The Horse and Jockey Safety and Welfare Account is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Sections 19606.1, 19616.51, 19620, 19620.1, and 19632, Section 13340 of the Government Code, or any other law, moneys from license fees imposed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 19460) shall be deposited in the Horse and Jockey Safety and Welfare Account and be continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for allocation by the Department of Finance to the board for equine safety measures to improve the integrity and safety of horse racing that shall include, but are not limited to, contracting for additional state veterinarians, stewards, and infrastructure support related to the safety and welfare of racehorses and jockeys.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 251, Sec. 8.   (AB 1974)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19640.

All money representing penalties or fines imposed by the stewards of a horse race meeting shall be collected by the licensee of the meeting and paid to the board within 10 business days after its close, and the board shall deposit all those moneys in the Horse and Jockey Safety and Welfare Account established pursuant to Section 19620.3, and be continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for allocation by the Department of Finance to the board for horse welfare and safety measures. The board shall publicly disclose on its internet website the horse welfare and safety measures it funds with these moneys. For purposes of this section, horse welfare and safety measures shall include all of the following:

(a) Contracting for additional state veterinarians.

(b) Adding additional stewards.

(c) Improving or adding race track infrastructure to directly improve the safety and welfare of horses and riders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 251, Sec. 9.   (AB 1974)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19641.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any redistributable money in a parimutuel pool subject to payment to a claimant pursuant to Section 19598, but not successfully claimed within that period, shall be paid to the board, as follows:

(A) An estimated payment equal to 20 percent of the preceding year’s unclaimed redistributable money paid pursuant to this paragraph shall be paid to the board on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1, or the next business day thereafter.

(B) On May 30, or the next business day thereafter, of the year following the close of a horse racing meeting, the association shall pay to the board all of the
 redistributable funds that are owed it pursuant to this paragraph, less estimated payments made pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(2) The money received by the board under this subdivision resulting from thoroughbred, harness, or quarter horse meetings, but excluding the meetings of the California Exposition and State Fair or of a county, district agricultural association, or citrus fruit fair, shall be used by the board to support research on matters pertaining to horse racing and racetrack security, but the money shall be subject to annual budgetary review by the Legislature. All of the redistributable money received by the board from other meetings shall be paid immediately into the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund.

(b) (1) One-half of the redistributable money resulting from the thoroughbred, harness, or quarter horse meetings, but excluding
 the meetings of the California Exposition and State Fair or county, district agricultural association, or citrus fruit fair meetings, shall be distributed to a welfare fund established for the benefit of horsemen and horsewomen and backstretch personnel, as follows:

(A) An estimated payment equal to 20 percent of the preceding year’s unclaimed redistributable money distributed pursuant to this paragraph shall be distributed to the welfare fund on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1, or the next business day thereafter.

(B) On May 30, or the next business day thereafter, of the year following the close of a horse racing meeting, the association shall pay to the welfare fund all of the redistributable funds that are owed it pursuant to this paragraph, less estimated payments made pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(2) The welfare fund shall make an accounting to the board within one calendar year of the receipt of the payment.

(3) Upon approval of the board, moneys under this subdivision may be used to provide treatment for, and support the health care needs of, licensees under this chapter, employees of racing associations, and members of horsemen’s and horsewomen’s organizations and other racing-related charitable organizations representing or assisting backstretch personnel, if the need for the treatment and support is related to the person’s participation in the horse racing industry.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (a) or (b), any remaining redistributable money in a parimutuel pool subject to payment to a claimant pursuant to Section 19598, but not successfully claimed within the period specified in that section, shall be distributed one-half to the board, for the
 purposes specified and in the manner specified in subdivision (a), and one-half to the welfare fund established by the horsemen’s and horsewomen’s organization described in subdivision (b) in the manner specified in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 420, Sec. 3.   (AB 1723)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19641.2.

(a) The nonprofit foundation authorized to receive funds pursuant to Section 19641 shall use those funds to administer a health and welfare trust fund without prejudice and for the benefit of every eligible person. The officers and directors of the health and welfare trust fund shall have a fiduciary responsibility to manage the fund for the benefit of the beneficiaries.

(b) Every employer of backstretch workers shall, upon request, submit in writing or electronically to the administrator of the welfare program for backstretch workers any employment records necessary for prompt payment of benefits and proper administration of the program. Upon request, employers shall also provide to the administrator access to any employment records necessary for prompt payment of benefits and proper administration of the program.

(c) At least one member of the health and welfare fund board shall be a member without financial interest in the horse racing industry appointed from a list of nominees submitted jointly by the California State Council of the Service Employees International Union, the Jockey’s Guild, and the California Teamsters Public Affairs Council.

(d) Nothing in this section is intended to affect the status of the welfare fund as a charity under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code or its compliance with the Charitable Purposes Act (Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19642.

Cash vouchers that are not redeemed within 365 days of the close of the racing meeting at which the voucher was purchased shall be distributed to a nonprofit organization designated by the board for purposes of maintaining a data base of horseracing information to further the purposes of Section 19444.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 311, Sec. 12.   Effective July 21, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19642.1.

In addition to the distributions specified in Sections 19605.7, 19605.71, and 19605.72, from the amounts that would normally be available for commissions and purses from wagering on all breeds, an amount not to exceed 0.05 percent of the total amount handled by each satellite wagering facility shall be distributed to the nonprofit organization designated by the board for purposes of maintaining a database of horse racing information to further the purposes of Section 19444. The amount distributable to the nonprofit organization initially shall be 0.05 percent of the total amount handled by each satellite wagering facility and may be adjusted by the board, in its discretion. The nonprofit organization shall annually submit its budget for the ensuing calendar year to the board at its
 November meeting and shall file quarterly financial statements with the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 283, Sec. 8.   (SB 1072)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Penalties [19660. - 19668.]

19660.

Any person who, without first having procured a license under Article 4 of this chapter, directly or indirectly holds or conducts any meeting where there is horse racing and betting on its results by the parimutuel method of wagering, or otherwise, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 111.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19661.

(a) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter for which a penalty is not herein expressly provided, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Unless otherwise expressly provided, the board may impose a monetary penalty of not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 933, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19662.

Any person who bets upon the results of a horse race except by a parimutuel method of wagering conducted by a person licensed under Article 4 of this chapter is punishable as provided in the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 112.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19663.

It is unlawful for an individual performing services as a jockey, or any person representing or purporting to represent such individual, to compel or attempt to compel the State, while conducting horse racing, either directly itself or through a state agency or state instrumentality, to pay money into any fund to which it has no legal obligation to contribute.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19664.

It is unlawful for any person, for the purpose of selling or offering to sell predictions on horse races, to advertise that he has predicted the outcome of any horse race which has been run in this state, unless such person has notified in writing the California Horse Racing Board, at any of its offices, of his predictions at least three hours prior to the race involved on forms prescribed by the board. No person shall advertise the fact that he has notified the board or use the name of the board in any way whatsoever to promote the activities described in this section.

For the purposes of this section the term “advertise” includes the use of a newspaper, magazine or other publication, book notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, handbill, tip sheet, poster, bill, sign, placard, card, label, tag, window display, store sign, radio or television announcement, or any other means or methods now or hereafter employed to bring to the attention of the public information concerning the outcome of horse races.

Nothing herein contained shall apply to any daily newspaper of general circulation which is regularly entered in the United States mail, or any other daily publication carrying complete past performances of horses entered in races, or to any regularly published magazine or periodical devoted to racing news, which magazine or periodical has been published for at least two years.

Violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 113.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19665.

The board shall establish such rules and regulations for horse sales or horse auction sales of racehorses or breeding stock that is used in the production of racehorses which are held or conducted on the premises of any racing association under the jurisdiction of the board as are reasonably necessary to provide the horses, owners, and general public with adequate protection. Such rules and regulations shall provide for regulation of the medication or drugging of racehorses sold at horse sales or horse auction sales as provided in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1194.)
-------------------------------------------

19666.

A person shall not alter or counterfeit, or attempt to alter or counterfeit, any parimutuel ticket.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 98, Sec. 3.   (AB 280)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19667.

No person shall knowingly have in his possession any altered, forged, or counterfeit parimutuel ticket.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 832.)
-------------------------------------------

19668.

(a) On and after July 1, 1995, it shall be unlawful for any person to enter or accept the entry of a horse in a race upon which there is parimutuel wagering until two years after the horse’s foaling date.

(b) Every person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. The board may suspend the license of any person who violates this section for a period of not more than one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 617, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. Mule Racing [19700. - 19705.]

19700.

“Board” as used in this chapter means the California Horse Racing Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 366.)
-------------------------------------------

19701.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a mule racing meeting or mule races may be conducted by any fair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 872, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19702.

The board shall administer this chapter and shall issue a license for the conducting of a mule racing meeting or mule races.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 317, Sec. 1.   Effective August 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19703.

The board, in cooperation with American Mule Association representatives, shall adopt rules governing, permitting, and regulating mule racing and wagering on the races under the parimutuel system. Such wagering shall be conducted only by a person licensed under this chapter to conduct a mule racing meeting, and only within the inclosure, and on the dates for which mule racing has been authorized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1133, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19704.

The board shall issue a license for owners, trainers, jockeys, and other participants in mule racing. The license shall be limited to mule races only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1133, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19705.

Associations licensed pursuant to this chapter shall deduct the applicable license fees, commissions, and purses in the same percentages as provided for in Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 19610) of Chapter 4. Associations may also deduct an additional amount of up to 3 percent on multiple wagering pools in the same manner as provided for by Section 19614.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 317, Sec. 2.   Effective August 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. The Gambling Control Act [19800. - 19987.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [19800. - 19807.]

19800.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Gambling Control Act.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 867, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19801.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) State law prohibits commercially operated lotteries, banked or percentage games, and gambling machines, and strictly regulates parimutuel wagering on horse racing. To the extent that state law categorically prohibits certain forms of gambling and prohibits gambling devices, nothing herein shall be construed, in any manner, to reflect a legislative intent to relax those prohibitions.

(b) The State of California has permitted the operation of gambling establishments for more than 100 years. Gambling establishments were first regulated by the State of California pursuant to legislation which was enacted in 1984. Gambling establishments currently employ more than 20,000 people in the State of California, and contribute more than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in taxes and fees to California’s government. Gambling establishments are lawful enterprises in the State of California, and are entitled to full protection of the laws of this state.

(c) Gambling can become addictive and is not an activity to be promoted or legitimized as entertainment for children and families.

(d) Unregulated gambling enterprises are inimical to the public health, safety, welfare, and good order. Accordingly, no person in this state has a right to operate a gambling enterprise except as may be expressly permitted by the laws of this state and by the ordinances of local governmental bodies.

(e) It is the policy of this state that gambling activities that are not expressly prohibited or regulated by state law may be prohibited or regulated by local government. Moreover, it is the policy of this state that no new gambling establishment may be opened in a city, county, or city and county in which a gambling establishment was not operating on and before January 1, 1984, except upon the affirmative vote of the electors of that city, county, or city and county.

(f) It is not the purpose of this chapter to expand opportunities for gambling, or to create any right to operate a gambling enterprise in this state or to have a financial interest in any gambling enterprise. Rather, it is the purpose of this chapter to regulate businesses that offer otherwise lawful forms of gambling games.

(g) Public trust that permissible gambling will not endanger public health, safety, or welfare requires that comprehensive measures be enacted to ensure that gambling is free from criminal and corruptive elements, that it is conducted honestly and competitively, and that it is conducted in suitable locations.

(h) Public trust and confidence can only be maintained by strict and comprehensive regulation of all persons, locations, practices, associations, and activities related to the operation of lawful gambling establishments and the manufacture and distribution of permissible gambling equipment.

(i) All gambling operations, all persons having a significant involvement in gambling operations, all establishments where gambling is conducted, and all manufacturers, sellers, and distributors of gambling equipment must be licensed and regulated to protect the public health, safety, and general welfare of the residents of this state as an exercise of the police powers of the state.

(j) To ensure that gambling is conducted honestly, competitively, and free of criminal and corruptive elements, all licensed gambling establishments in this state must remain open to the general public and the access of the general public to licensed gambling activities must not be restricted in any manner, except as provided by the Legislature. However, subject to state and federal prohibitions against discrimination, nothing herein shall be construed to preclude exclusion of unsuitable persons from licensed gambling establishments in the exercise of reasonable business judgment.

(k) In order to effectuate state policy as declared herein, it is necessary that gambling establishments, activities, and equipment be licensed, that persons participating in those activities be licensed or registered, that certain transactions, events, and processes involving gambling establishments and owners of gambling establishments be subject to prior approval or permission, that unsuitable persons not be permitted to associate with gambling activities or gambling establishments, and that gambling activities take place only in suitable locations. Any license or permit issued, or other approval granted pursuant to this chapter, is declared to be a revocable privilege, and no holder acquires any vested right therein or thereunder.

(l) The location of lawful gambling premises, the hours of operation of those premises, the number of tables permitted in those premises, and wagering limits in permissible games conducted in those premises are proper subjects for regulation by local governmental bodies. However, consideration of those same subjects by a state regulatory agency, as specified in this chapter, is warranted when local governmental regulation respecting those subjects is inadequate or the regulation fails to safeguard the legitimate interests of residents in other governmental jurisdictions.

(m) The exclusion or ejection of certain persons from gambling establishments is necessary to effectuate the policies of this chapter and to maintain effectively the strict regulation of licensed gambling.

(n) Records and reports of cash and credit transactions involving gambling establishments may have a high degree of usefulness in criminal and regulatory investigations and, therefore, licensed gambling operators may be required to keep records and make reports concerning significant cash and credit transactions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 438, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19802.

The Legislature further finds and declares as follows:

Appropriate regulation of banking and percentage games or of gambling devices consistent with public safety and welfare would require, at a minimum, all of the following safeguards:

(a) The creation of an adequately funded gambling control commission with comprehensive powers to establish minimum standards and technical specifications for gambling equipment and devices.

(b) The creation of an adequately funded law enforcement capability within state government to inspect, test, and evaluate gambling equipment and devices and modifications thereto.

(c) An appropriation by the Legislature to sufficiently fund a full-time commission and law enforcement capability with responsibilities commensurate with the expanded scope of gambling.

(d) The enactment of necessary regulations setting forth standards and procedures for the licensing of persons connected with the manufacture, sale, and distribution of equipment and devices in this state.

(e) The enactment of standards related to the trustworthiness and fairness of equipment and devices, upon the commission’s recommendation to the Legislature.

(f) The enactment of statutory provisions governing the importation, transportation, sale, and disposal of equipment and devices, upon the commission’s recommendation to the Legislature.

(g) The enactment of statutes providing for appropriate inspection and testing of equipment and devices, upon the commission’s recommendation to the Legislature.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19801.2 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19803.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, to provide uniform, minimum standards of regulation of permissible gambling activities and the operation of lawful gambling establishments.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to preclude any city, county, or city and county from prohibiting any gambling activity, from imposing more stringent local controls or conditions upon gambling than are imposed by this chapter or by the commission, from inspecting gambling premises to enforce applicable state and local laws, or from imposing any local tax or license fee, if the prohibition, control, condition, inspection, tax, or fee is not inconsistent with this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect the responsibility of local law enforcement agencies to enforce the laws of this state, including this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19802 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19804.

(a) In any action for declaratory or injunctive relief, or for relief by way of any extraordinary writ, other than an action initiated pursuant to Section 19932, wherein the construction, application, or enforcement of this chapter, or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto, or any order of the department or the commission issued pursuant thereto, is called into question, a court shall not grant any preliminary or permanent injunction, or any peremptory writ of mandate, certiorari, or prohibition, in connection therewith, except as follows:

(1) Upon proof by clear and convincing evidence that the department or the commission is abusing or threatens to abuse its discretion.

(2) Upon proof by clear and convincing evidence that the department or the commission is exceeding or threatens to exceed its jurisdiction.

(b) No temporary injunction or other provisional order shall issue to restrain, stay, or otherwise interfere with any action by the department or the commission, except upon a finding by the court, based on clear and convincing evidence, that the public interest will not be prejudiced thereby, and, except for preliminary injunctions, no order may be effective for more than 15 calendar days, except by stipulation of the department or commission. No preliminary order may be effective for more than 45 days, except by stipulation of the department or commission.

(c) This section does
 not relieve a petitioner’s obligation to exhaust administrative remedies.

(d) In an action for relief of any nature wherein the construction, application, or enforcement of this chapter, or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto, or any order of the department or commission issued pursuant thereto, is called into question, the party filing the pleading shall furnish a copy thereof to the department and to the commission. The copy shall be furnished by the party filing the pleading within 10 business days after filing.

(e) This section does not apply to an action for declaratory or injunctive relief authorized by Section 98020 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 860, Sec. 3.   (SB 549)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19805.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Affiliate” means a person who, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, a specified person.

(b) “Applicant” means a person who has applied for a state gambling license, a key employee license, a registration, a finding of suitability, a work permit, a manufacturer’s or distributor’s license, or an approval of any act or transaction for which the approval or authorization of the commission or department is required or permitted under this chapter.

(c) “Banking game” or “banked game” does not include a controlled game if
 the published rules of the game feature a player-dealer position and provide that this position must be continuously and systematically rotated amongst each of the participants during the play of the game, ensure that the player-dealer is able to win or lose only a fixed and limited wager during the play of the game, and preclude the house, another entity, a player, or an observer from maintaining or operating as a bank during the course of the game. For purposes of this section, it is not the intent of the Legislature to mandate acceptance of the deal by every player if the department finds that the rules of the game render the maintenance of or operation of a bank impossible by other means. The house shall not occupy the player-dealer position.

(d) “Chief” means the head of the entity within the department that is responsible for fulfilling the obligations imposed upon the department by this chapter.

(e) “Commission” means the California Gambling Control Commission.

(f) “Controlled gambling” means to deal, operate, carry on, conduct, maintain, or expose for play any controlled game.

(g) “Controlled game” means any controlled game, as defined by subdivision (e) of Section 337j of the Penal Code.

(h) “Department” means the Department of Justice.

(i) “Director” means a director of a corporation or a person performing similar functions with respect to any organization.

(j) “Finding of suitability” means a finding that a person meets the qualification criteria described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 19857, and that the
 person would not be disqualified from holding a state gambling license on any of the grounds specified in Section 19859.

(k) “Game” and “gambling game” means a controlled game.

(l) “Gambling” means to deal, operate, carry on, conduct, maintain, or expose for play a controlled game.

(m) “Gambling enterprise” means a natural person or an entity, whether individual, corporate, or otherwise, that conducts a gambling operation and that by virtue is required to hold a state gambling license under this chapter.

(n) “Gambling enterprise employee” means a natural person employed in the operation of a gambling enterprise, including, without limitation, dealers, floor personnel, security employees, countroom personnel, cage personnel, collection personnel,
 surveillance personnel, data-processing personnel, appropriate maintenance personnel, waiters and waitresses, and secretaries, or any other natural person whose employment duties require or authorize access to restricted gambling establishment areas. “Gambling enterprise employee” does not include a natural person employed solely to serve or prepare food or beverages if those duties are performed only in areas of the establishment in which gambling is not
 conducted.

(o) “Gambling establishment,” “establishment,” or “licensed premises,” except as otherwise defined in Section 19812, means one or more rooms where a controlled gambling or activity directly related to controlled gambling occurs.

(p) “Gambling license” or “state gambling license” means a license issued by the state that authorizes the person named therein to conduct a gambling operation.

(q) “Gambling operation” means exposing for play one or more controlled games that are dealt, operated, carried on, conducted, or maintained for commercial gain.

(r) “Gross revenue” means the total of all compensation received for conducting any controlled game, and includes interest received in payment for credit
 extended by an owner licensee to a patron for purposes of gambling, except as provided by regulation.

(s) “Hours of operation” means the period during which a gambling establishment is open to conduct the play of controlled games within a 24-hour period. In determining whether there has been expansion of gambling relating to “hours of operation,” the department shall consider the hours in the day when the local ordinance permitted the gambling establishment to be open for business on January 1, 1996, and compare the current ordinance and the hours during which the gambling establishment may be open for business. The fact that the ordinance was amended to permit gambling on a day, when gambling was not permitted on January 1, 1996, shall not be considered in determining whether there has been gambling in excess of that permitted by Section 19961.

(t) “House” means the gambling
 enterprise, and any owner, shareholder, partner, key employee, or landlord thereof.

(u) “Independent agent,” except as provided by regulation, means a person who does either of the following:

(1) Collects debt evidenced by a credit instrument.

(2) Contracts with an owner licensee, or an affiliate thereof, to provide services consisting of arranging transportation or lodging for guests at a gambling establishment.

(v) “Initial license” means the license first issued to a person authorizing that person to commence the activities authorized by that license.

(w) “Institutional investor” means a retirement fund administered by a public agency for the exclusive benefit of federal, state, or
 local public employees, an investment company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80a-1 et seq.), a collective investment trust organized by banks under Part 9 of the Rules of the Comptroller of the Currency, a closed-end investment trust, a chartered or licensed life insurance company or property and casualty insurance company, a banking and other chartered or licensed lending institution, an investment adviser registered under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80b-1 et seq.) acting in that capacity, and other persons as the commission may determine for reasons consistent with the policies of this chapter.

(x) “Key employee” means a natural person employed in the operation of a gambling enterprise in a supervisory capacity or empowered to make discretionary decisions that regulate gambling operations, including, without limitation, pit bosses, shift bosses, credit executives, cashier operations
 supervisors, gambling operation managers and assistant managers, managers or supervisors of security employees, or any other natural person designated as a key employee by the department for reasons consistent with the policies of this chapter. “Key employee” does not include a natural person who is employed solely to supervise employees whose duties are solely to serve or prepare food or beverages if the supervisor and the employees perform their duties only in areas of the establishment in which gambling is not conducted.

(y) “Key employee license” means a state license authorizing the holder to be employed as a key employee.

(z) “License” means a gambling license, key employee
 license, or any other license issued by the commission pursuant to this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(aa) “Licensed gambling establishment” means the gambling premises encompassed by a state gambling license.

(ab) “Limited partnership” means a partnership formed by two or more persons having as members one or more general partners and one or more limited partners.

(ac) “Limited partnership interest” means the right of a general or limited partner to any of the following:

(1) To receive from a limited partnership any of the following:

(A) A share of the revenue.

(B) Any other compensation by way of
 income.

(C) A return of any or all of the partner’s contribution to capital of the limited partnership.

(2) To exercise any of the rights provided under state law.

(ad) “Owner licensee” means an owner of a gambling enterprise who holds a state gambling license.

(ae) “Person,” unless otherwise indicated, includes a natural person, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, trust, joint venture, association, or any other business organization.

(af) “Player” means a patron of a gambling establishment who participates in a controlled game.

(ag) “Player-dealer” and “controlled game featuring a player-dealer position” refer to